Tennessee statutes. Title 64 Regional Authorities
Chapter 6

Tennessee Regional Megasite Authority Act of 2007

64-6-101. Short title — Creation and establishment of regional megasite authority.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Regional Megasite Authority Act of 2007.”

A regional authority may be established and created as a regional megasite authority pursuant to this chapter. Section 7-53-104(b) shall apply to a regional megasite authority, which shall have the same powers and authority granted to a corporation under title 7, chapter 53, except as otherwise provided in this chapter. Notwithstanding anything in title 7, chapter 53 to the contrary, in the event of a conflict, this chapter shall control. A regional megasite authority may be established for the purpose of acquiring land, improving, financing, operating, maintaining and marketing a megasite and may be created by two (2) or more participating municipalities; provided, that at least one (1) of the municipalities includes the location of the megasite or may be created by the commissioner of economic and community development in accordance with § 64-6-110.

Acts 2007, ch. 426, § 1; 2009, ch. 158, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former ch. 6, §§64-6-101 —64-6-110 (Acts 1988, ch. 660, §§ 1-10), concerning the superconducting super collider regional authority, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 660, § 12.

For the Preamble to the act regarding the Tennessee Regional Megasite Authority Act of 2007, please refer to Acts 2007, ch. 426.

The Memphis regional megasite authority, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§4-29-112,4-29-243.

64-6-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, terms shall be as defined in §7-53-101, except as provided below or unless the context otherwise requires:

“Authority” means a regional megasite authority created pursuant to this chapter;

“Governing body” means the legislative body of a county or the legislative body of an incorporated municipality;

“Megasite” means a site certified as being suitable and available for development for significant economic and industrial investment as provided in § 64-6-103; and

“Project” means all or any part of, or any interest in, any land and building, including an office building, any facility or other improvement on the land and all real and personal properties located either on a megasite or off a megasite deemed necessary in connection with the megasite, whether or not now in existence, that are suitable for any industrial or commercial enterprises or any combination of the land, buildings, facilities, improvements or real or personal properties located at the megasite.

Acts 2007, ch. 426, § 1; 2009, ch. 158, § 2.

64-6-103. Certification of a megasite.

In order for a site to be considered for certification as a megasite, the site should generally consist of a minimum of one thousand (1,000) contiguous acres; provided, however, that, in addition to the one thousand (1,000) acres of contiguous property, other proximate but noncontiguous property may be a part of the megasite. Certification of a site shall be pursuant to a process approved by the commissioner of economic and community development.

The commissioner of economic and community development may approve a proposed megasite certification process as being consistent with this chapter when the determination of suitability and availability of a site for development is based upon, but not limited to, consideration of zoning, location, transportation access, utilities access, topography, geotechnical characteristics, environmental review, title and community support.

Certification of a site as constituting a megasite pursuant to an approved process shall be filed with the commissioner and shall be deemed conclusive.

Acts 2007, ch. 426, § 1; 2009, ch. 158, § 3.

64-6-104. Participating municipality — Incorporation of the authority —
Certificate of incorporation — Organizational meeting.

For the purposes of this chapter, for a county or an incorporated municipality to be a “participating municipality,” the county or incorporated municipality may, upon approval by a majority vote of its governing body, elect to participate in a regional megasite authority as set out in this chapter. In the event such an election is made, this chapter shall apply to all counties and incorporated municipalities making such an election; provided, that participation shall be limited to any county or incorporated municipality that:

Includes all or part of a megasite within the county or incorporated municipality;

Is a county that is contiguous to the county in which the megasite is wholly or partially located; or

Is the incorporated municipality with the largest population that elects to become a participating municipality in the county in which the megasite is wholly or partially located or is the incorporated municipality with the largest population that elects to become a participating municipality in a county that is contiguous to the county in which the megasite is wholly or partially located.

A participating municipality may sell, lease, give, provide or otherwise supply such personnel or services and may appropriate such funds to the authority as may be within its legal power to furnish.

If the governing body of a county or an incorporated municipality, by appropriate resolution duly adopted, finds and determines that it is wise, expedient, necessary or advisable that the authority be formed, elects to participate and approves the form of certificate of incorporation proposed to be used in organizing the authority, then the governing body shall designate a person as an incorporator to assist with the execution, acknowledgement and filing of a certificate of incorporation for the authority.

The certificate of incorporation shall set forth:

The name of the authority;

The participating municipalities and the dates of elections by the governing bodies;

The number of voting directors;

The names and residences of the designated incorporators;

The location of the principal office of the corporation;

The purposes for which the authority is organized;

The period, if any, for the duration of the authority; and

Any other matter deemed appropriate and consistent with this chapter and the laws of this state.

When executed and acknowledged by the incorporators, the certificate shall be filed with the secretary of state and may be subsequently amended or the authority dissolved, all consistent with title 7, chapter 53.

Within thirty (30) days of filing the certificate with the secretary of state, the incorporators shall meet in an organizational meeting, adopt temporary bylaws and notify appointing authorities of the organizational activities and set the meeting date by which members are to be appointed, which date shall provide sufficient time for those appointments.

Acts 2007, ch. 426, § 1; 2009, ch. 158, §§ 4-9.

Compiler's Notes. For table of population of Tennessee municipalities, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

64-6-105. Board of directors.

The authority shall be governed by a board of directors in which all powers of the corporation shall be vested. The membership of the board shall include the following:

For each county that chooses to be a participating municipality in accordance with § 64-6-104(a), the county mayor or a designee of the county mayor of that county;

The mayor or the designee of the mayor in an incorporated municipality that chooses to be a participating municipality in accordance with § 64-6-104(a);

The two (2) speakers of the respective houses acting jointly after consultation with the members whose districts lie within the participating counties shall appoint one (1) member;

The governor, after consultation with the mayors of the participating municipalities, shall appoint one (1) member; and

The chancellor of the board of regents shall appoint one (1) member from the presidents of the community colleges that have a campus within the participating counties.

For the purposes of calculating terms, members serving on a board as of January 1, 2013, shall serve until December 31, 2014. At the conclusion of such terms:

Each regular term of the board member appointed jointly by the speakers beginning January 1, 2015, shall be two (2) years, to be coterminous with the terms of office of the speakers;

Each regular term of the board member appointed by the governor beginning January 1, 2015, shall be four (4) years, to be coterminous with the term of office of the governor; and

Each regular term of all other board members appointed in accordance with this subsection (a) beginning January 1, 2015, shall be for three (3) years.

Board members shall serve until their successors are appointed. If a vacancy occurs on the board, the remainder of the term shall be filled by the respective appointing authorities in accordance with this subsection (a).

Any board created pursuant to this subsection (a) shall cease to exist upon the completion of the sale of a megasite governed by such board.

The directors shall serve without compensation, except that they shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses incurred in and about the performance of their duties, unless otherwise authorized by local ordinance or resolution.

The board shall elect such officers and adopt such bylaws as deemed appropriate.

The board may elect an executive committee from among its members, which may act on behalf of the board between regular board meetings.

A director who can designate a representative shall make the designation in writing, addressed to the chair of the authority specifying the meeting for which the designation is effective, to be filed in advance of the meeting.

Acts 2007, ch. 426, § 1; 2009, ch. 158, §§ 10-12; 2013, ch. 265, § 1.

64-6-106. Powers of the authority.

In addition to powers and authority granted to a corporation under title 7, chapter 53, the authority is authorized and empowered to:

Accept any gifts, or grants, loans of funds or financial or other aid in any form from the federal government or any agency or instrumentality of the federal government or from the state or a municipality, including a participating municipality, or from any other source and to comply, subject to this chapter, with the terms and conditions thereof; and

Provide technical assistance to participating municipalities in planning for the development of the megasite.

The authority is authorized and empowered to issue bonds from time to time. All provisions of title 7, chapter 53, regarding bonds shall apply to the authority and any bonds issued by the authority. Any resolution of the authority authorizing the sale of bonds shall be submitted to the state funding board established by § 9-9-101, and the resolution shall only become effective upon receiving the approval of the state funding board. The state funding board, upon rejecting any resolution of the board authorizing any bond issue, shall state in writing the reasons for this action.

Acts 2007, ch. 426, § 1.

64-6-107. Exemption from taxation — Payments in lieu of taxes.

The authority is declared to be performing a public function on behalf of the participating municipalities and to be a public instrumentality of the municipalities. Accordingly, the authority and all properties at any time owned by the authority, the income and revenues from the properties and all bonds issued by the authority and the income from the bonds shall be exempt from all taxation in the state.

For purposes of the Securities Act of 1980, compiled in title 48, chapter 1, part 1, bonds issued by the authority shall be deemed to be securities issued by a public instrumentality or a political subdivision of the state.

A participating municipality in which a portion of a megasite is located may delegate to the authority the power to negotiate and enter into, with an authority's lessees, payments in lieu of ad valorem taxes; provided, that the authorization shall be granted only upon a finding that the payments are deemed to be in furtherance of the authority's public purposes as defined in this chapter. No contract, lease, understanding, or other agreement of any kind, including any renewal or extension of the agreement, entered into by the authority to which such power has been delegated shall permit payment in lieu of taxes to be waived or otherwise not assessed for a period of greater than twenty (20) years from the date of the contract, lease, understanding or other agreement, unless both the commissioner of economic and community development and the comptroller of the treasury have made a written determination that the agreement is in the best interest of the state. The authority shall attach to each agreement an analysis of the costs and benefits of the agreement, in such manner and under such conditions as shall be prescribed by the commissioner of economic and community development or the commissioner's designee. The legislative body of a participating municipality making the delegation may, in its sole discretion, require the authority to submit any such agreement to the applicable legislative body for its approval.

If the project is located within the corporate limits of a municipality, then payments shall be shared between the incorporated municipality and the county in which the megasite is located, proportionate to their property tax levies in effect on the date of execution of the agreement for payments in lieu of taxes.

The trustee shall bill and collect all payments in lieu of taxes based on the agreement and the apportioned taxes.

An agreement for payment in lieu of taxes shall contain such terms and conditions as the authority may determine, which may include, but shall not be limited to, provisions to:

Defer and subordinate or defer or subordinate payment of all or a portion of the payment in lieu of taxes to such future time as the authority may determine; and

Require interest to accrue on such deferred amount.

Before October 1 of each year, each lessee of the authority shall submit to the state board of equalization an annual report containing:

A list of all the real and personal property owned by the authority and its associated entities and subsidiaries;

The value of each listed property as estimated by the lessee;

The date and term of the lease for each listed property;

The amount of payments made in lieu of property taxes for each listed property;

The date each listed property is scheduled to return to the regular tax rolls; and

A calculation of the taxes that would have been due for each listed property if the properties were privately owned or otherwise subject to taxation.

Each lessee of the authority shall be responsible for the timely completion and filing of the report and failure to timely complete and file the report shall subject the lessees to a penalty; provided, that no lessee shall be liable that has provided the state board of equalization with the information required by this section insofar as may be pertinent to property leased by the lessee from the authority. The penalty for late filing shall be fifty dollars ($50.00) for each day the report is late up to a maximum of five hundred dollars ($500), and the maximum penalty shall accrue interest at the rate of one and one-half percent (1.5%) per month, plus any cost of collection.

Acts 2007, ch. 426, § 1.

64-6-108. Economic impact plan — Allocation of taxes.

The authority is authorized to prepare and submit to the participating municipalities for approval an economic impact plan in the manner described in this section.

An economic impact plan shall be a written document and shall specifically identify the area to be included in the plan. The area to be included in the plan shall be located in the participating municipalities and shall also include the county in which the megasite is located. In addition to the megasite, the area that is the subject of the economic impact plan may also include any other properties that the authority determines will be directly improved or benefited due to the undertaking of the megasite. The area may include one (1) or more portions that are not contiguous to the rest of the area. The economic impact plan shall:

Identify the boundaries of the area subject to the plan;

Discuss the expected benefits to the participating counties from the development of the area subject to the plan, including anticipated tax receipts and jobs created; and

Provide that the property taxes imposed on the property, including the personal property, located within the area subject to the plan shall be distributable in the manner described in subsection (c) for a period of time specified in the plan.

Upon the approval by the participating municipalities of an economic impact plan with respect to an area, all property taxes levied upon property located within the area by any taxing agency after the effective date of the plan shall be divided as follows:

That portion of the taxes that is equal to the amount of taxes, if any, that were payable with respect to the property for the year prior to the date the economic impact plan was approved, the base tax amount, to the participating municipalities shall be allocated to and, when collected, shall be paid to the respective taxing agencies as taxes levied by those taxing agencies on all other property are paid; provided, that in any year in which the taxes on any property are less than the base tax amount, there shall be allocated and paid to the respective taxing agencies only those taxes actually imposed; and

Any excess of taxes over the base tax amount shall be allocated to and, when collected, shall be paid into a separate fund of the authority established to hold such payments until applied for the purposes described in subsection (h).

Notwithstanding subsection (a) to the contrary, the authority may prepare, and the participating municipalities may approve, an economic impact plan that allocates an amount greater than the base tax amount to the taxing agencies.

An economic impact plan shall not provide for an allocation of taxes to the authority for a period in excess of thirty (30) years.

The governing bodies of the participating municipalities may approve an economic impact plan by resolution, notwithstanding any local charter provision or other provision to the contrary. If the area subject to an economic impact plan is located within the corporate limits of a municipality, the taxes that would otherwise be payable to the municipality or county shall not be paid to the authority unless the city, town or county has also approved the economic impact plan.

Before the authority submits an economic impact plan for approval to the governing bodies of the participating municipalities or to any other municipality, the authority shall hold a public hearing relating to the proposed plan after publishing adequate public notice of the public hearing at least two (2) weeks prior to the date of the public hearing. The notice shall include the time, place and purpose of the public hearing, and notice of how a map of the area subject to the plan can be viewed by the public.

All taxes allocated to the authority pursuant to this section shall only be applied by the authority to pay expenses of the board in furtherance of promoting economic development in the participating municipalities, to pay the cost of projects or to pay debt service on bonds or other obligations issued by the authority to pay the cost of the projects. The authority is authorized to pledge any or all amounts received by the authority pursuant to this section to the payment of such bonds or other obligations.

After the approval by a municipality of an economic impact plan, the clerk or other recording official of the municipality shall transmit to the appropriate tax assessors and to each taxing agency to be affected, a copy of the description of all property within the area subject to the economic impact plan and a copy of the resolution approving that plan. If the plan is approved by any taxing agency other than the municipality, the clerk or other recording official of that taxing agency shall also provide a copy of the resolution approving the plan to the tax assessors and taxing agencies.

Acts 2007, ch. 426, § 1; 2009, ch. 158, §§ 13, 14.

64-6-109. Review and termination.

Any authority established shall be subject to the governmental entity review law, compiled in title 4, chapter 29, and reviewed pursuant to §4-29-119.

Acts 2007, ch. 426, § 1.

64-6-110. Alternative method of establishing and governing an authority.

This section creates an alternative method of establishing and governing an authority instead of §§ 64-6-104 and 64-6-105(a).

If the commissioner of economic and community development finds and determines that it is wise, expedient, necessary or advisable that the authority be formed and approves the form of certificate of incorporation proposed to be used in organizing the authority, then the commissioner shall act as incorporator or designate a person as incorporator to execute, acknowledge and file a certificate of incorporation for the authority, which certificate shall set forth:

The name of the authority;

The number of voting directors;

The name and residence of the incorporator;

The location of the principal office of the corporation;

The purpose for which the authority is created;

The period, if any, for the duration of the authority; and

Any other matter deemed appropriate and consistent with this chapter and the laws of this state.

When executed and acknowledged by the incorporator, the certificate shall be filed with the secretary of state and may be subsequently amended or the authority dissolved, all consistent with title 7, chapter 53. Within thirty (30) days of filing the certificate with the secretary of state, the incorporator shall adopt temporary bylaws.

The authority formed pursuant to this section shall be governed by a board of directors in which all powers of the corporation shall be vested. The membership of the board shall include the following:

The county mayor or a designee of the county mayor of the county in which the megasite is located or, if it is located in more than one (1) county, the county in which the megasite is predominately located;

The mayor or the designee of the mayor in the incorporated municipality with the largest population in a county in which the megasite is located or, if it is located in more than one (1) county, the county in which the megasite is predominately located;

The two (2) speakers of the respective houses acting jointly after consultation with the members whose districts lie within the participating counties shall appoint two (2) members;

The governor shall appoint two (2) at-large members and three (3) additional members representing and residing in counties contiguous to the county in which the megasite is located. At the time of initial appointment, the three (3) additional members shall be selected from counties not otherwise represented on the board. Notwithstanding any provision of this part to the contrary, the three (3) additional members shall serve without reimbursement for their actual travel expenses;

The chancellor of the board of regents shall appoint one (1) member from the presidents of the community colleges that have a campus within a county in which the megasite is wholly or partially located or within a county contiguous thereto; and

The executive director of the development district in which the megasite is located.

For the purposes of calculating terms, members serving on a board as of January 1, 2013, shall serve until December 31, 2014, at which time their terms shall expire. At the conclusion of such terms:

Each regular term of the board members appointed jointly by the speakers beginning January 1, 2015, shall be two (2) years, to be coterminous with the terms of office of the speakers;

Each regular term of the board members appointed by the governor beginning January 1, 2015, shall be four (4) years, to be coterminous with the term of office of the governor; and

Each regular term of all other board members appointed in accordance with this subsection (c) beginning January 1, 2015, shall be for three (3) years.

Board members shall serve until their successors are appointed. If a vacancy occurs on the board, the remainder of the term shall be filled by the respective appointing authorities in accordance with this subsection (c).

Any board created pursuant to this subsection (c) shall cease to exist upon the completion of the sale of a megasite governed by such board.

For purposes of authorities established and governed under this section, “participating municipality” means each incorporated municipality or county in which the megasite is wholly or partially located.

Acts 2009, ch. 158, § 15; 2010, ch. 970, § 1; 2011, ch. 196, § 1; 2013, ch. 265, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For table of population of Tennessee municipalities, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

64-6-111. Regional megasite authorities subject to governmental entity review law — Scope of review — Review as part of performance audit.

The following regional megasite authorities shall be subject to review pursuant to the Tennessee Governmental Entity Review Law, compiled in title 4, chapter 29: Memphis regional megasite authority;

The review conducted pursuant to this section by the division of state audit in the office of the comptroller of the treasury shall include, but not be limited to, information submitted by lessees of authorities in their annual report to the state board of equalization as prescribed in § 64-6-107(d).

The division of state audit may conduct its review of the regional megasite authorities as part of the performance audit conducted on the department of economic and community development; provided, that both entities are subject to review in the same year by the joint evaluation committees created by § 4-29-103.

Acts 2014, ch. 627, § 2.